Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
ARTICLE 3
REGULATION OF RATES AND CHARGES

Cross references:

For the regulation of rates and charges by municipal utilities, see article 3.5 of this title.

Section

40-3-101. Reasonable charges - adequate service.

All charges made, demanded, or received by any public utility for any rate, fare, product, or commodity furnished or to be furnished or any service rendered or to be rendered shall be just and reasonable. Every unjust or unreasonable charge made, demanded, or received for such rate, fare, product or commodity, or service is prohibited and declared unlawful. Rates and charges demanded or received by any public utility for gas transportation service furnished or to be furnished shall not be deemed to be unjust or unreasonable so long as said rate or charge is no greater than a maximum rate and no lower than a minimum rate determined by the commission (or, in the case of a municipal utility, by the governing body of the municipal utility in accordance with sections 40-3-102 and 40-3.5-102) to be just and reasonable, and the provision of such gas transportation service at such rates or charges shall not constitute per se unjust discrimination or the granting of a preference. Nothing in this subsection (1) shall limit or restrict the commission's authority to regulate rates and charges, correct abuses, or prevent unjust discrimination.

Every public utility shall furnish, provide, and maintain such service, instrumentalities, equipment, and facilities as shall promote the safety, health, comfort, and convenience of its patrons, employees, and the public, and as shall in all respects be adequate, efficient, just, and reasonable.

If a retail cooperative electric association, in conjunction with the payment of an applicable charge, withdraws from membership in a wholesale electric cooperative, as defined in section 40-2-136 (3)(c), that withdrawal is deemed to be a matter of statewide concern, and, in relation to such withdrawal:

The wholesale electric cooperative will act in accordance with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing in implementing the withdrawal and shall not require or impose commercially unreasonable contractual terms on the retail cooperative electric association in relation to the withdrawal; and

The wholesale electric cooperative shall, upon request from the withdrawing retail cooperative electric association, facilitate the retail cooperative electric association's transition from native load to a firm service transmission customer without diminishing the withdrawing retail cooperative electric association's native electric load priority for accessing firm transmission capacity.

The commission has the authority to adjudicate complaints about the terms on which a wholesale electric cooperative implements withdrawal pursuant to this subsection (3).

Source:

L. 13:

p. 468, § 13.

C.L.

§ 2924.

CSA:

C. 137, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-1.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1417, § 9, effective April 19.

L. 2020:

(3) added, (HB 20-1225), ch. 94, p. 373, § 4, effective March 27.

Cross references:

(1) For hearings on rate schedules, see § 40-6-111; for reparation for excessive charges, see § 40-6-119.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 20-1225, see section 1 of chapter 94, Session Laws of Colorado 2020.

40-3-102. Regulation of rates - correction of abuses.

The power and authority is hereby vested in the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado and it is hereby made its duty to adopt all necessary rates, charges, and regulations to govern and regulate all rates, charges, and tariffs of every public utility of this state to correct abuses; to prevent unjust discriminations and extortions in the rates, charges, and tariffs of such public utilities of this state; to generally supervise and regulate every public utility in this state; and to do all things, whether specifically designated in articles 1 to 7 of this title or in addition thereto, which are necessary or convenient in the exercise of such power, and to enforce the same by the penalties provided in said articles through proper courts having jurisdiction; except that nothing in this article shall apply to municipal natural gas or electric utilities for which an exemption is provided in the constitution of the state of Colorado, within the authorized service area of each such municipal utility except as specifically provided in section 40-3.5-102.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 469, § 14.

C.L.

§ 2925.

CSA:

C. 137, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-2.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1552, § 1, effective June 17.

Cross references:

For definition of a public utility, see § 40-1-103; for penalties for violation, see article 7 of this title.

40-3-103. Utilities to file rate schedules - rules.

Under the rules prescribed by the commission, each public utility shall file with the commission, within the time and in the form designated by the commission, and shall print and keep open to public inspection, schedules showing all rates, tolls, rentals, charges, and classifications collected or enforced, or to be collected and enforced, together with all rules, regulations, contracts, privileges, and facilities that in any manner affect or relate to rates, tolls, rentals, classifications, or service.

On or after January 1, 2018, on a schedule determined by the commission, each investor-owned electric utility shall file for the commission's review a comprehensive billing format that the investor-owned electric utility has developed for its monthly billing of customers. The comprehensive billing format must include the following components of a customer's monthly bill:

A line-item representation of all monthly charges and credits applied to the customer and an indication of whether the charges have changed from the prior month as a result of changes in fuel costs;

For months in which tiered rates are applied, a breakdown of the tiered rates and the amount of usage to which each rate was applied for the month;

The daily average cost for the current month compared to the same month in the previous calendar year;

A glossary of terms used by the utility in the monthly bill;

A description of each of the monthly fees that the utility may charge the customer;

The usage for the current month and each of the previous twelve months, as shown in a bar graph or similar visual format; and

For customers to which demand rates apply, a listing of the applicable demand charge, the peak demand during the billing period, and, provided the utility can reasonably ascertain such data, the date and time at which the peak demand occurred.

Each investor-owned electric utility shall provide its customers, on a biannual basis, with either an onsert or an insert that indicates, as a percentage, each fuel source used in power generation and purchased for that utility, including renewable energy sources, natural gas, and coal.

The commission shall review a filing submitted pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section within thirty days after the filing. If the commission determines that the filing does not meet the comprehensive billing format requirements set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section, the commission may require the investor-owned electric utility to resubmit a comprehensive billing format in compliance with the requirements. The commission shall notify the investor-owned electric utility in writing of the reasons for the deficiency, and the investor-owned electric utility shall resubmit a comprehensive billing format in compliance with the requirements of subsection (2)(a) of this section within sixty days after the date of the commission's notice of deficiency; except that the commission may, upon request, extend the deadline.

After the commission has approved a comprehensive billing format submitted by an investor-owned electric utility pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the investor-owned electric utility need not resubmit a comprehensive billing format unless the investor-owned electric utility makes changes to its comprehensive billing format.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 469, § 15.

C.L.

§ 2926.

CSA:

C. 137, § 16.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-3.

L. 69:

p. 964, § 75.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 2427, § 1, effective June 8.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1103, § 26, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 1244, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-105), ch. 224, p. 862, § 1, effective May 22.

40-3-103.5. Medical exemption - tiered electricity rates - rules.

Notwithstanding any provision of articles 1 to 7 of this title 40 to the contrary, the commission shall adopt rules to create an exemption from any tiered electricity rate plan based on a customer's medical condition. The commission's rules must provide a mechanism for the recovery of costs associated with implementing and providing the medical exemption.

The commission may determine the definition of "medical condition"; except that the definition must include multiple sclerosis, epilepsy, quadriplegia, and paraplegia. The medical exemption is for individuals who have the verification of a physician licensed in Colorado of a heat-sensitive medical condition or the need for the use of an essential life support device.

If the commission determines that a means test is necessary for the medical exemption, the commission shall use no less than four hundred percent of the federal poverty level for the customer's household as the maximum income to be eligible for the medical exemption.

If the low-income energy assistance program is used to certify eligibility, the medical exemption under this section must be distinguishable from the heat assistance benefits offered under the low-income energy assistance program because these programs may have different eligibility requirements.

On and after September 1, 2020, the commission shall require utilities periodically to report, pursuant to section 40-3-110, the number of their customers who receive the medical exemption under this section and to describe the efforts the utilities have made during each reporting period to facilitate the enrollment of qualified persons in their medical exemption programs.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-087), ch. 80, p. 218, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-282), ch. 292, p. 1562, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2020:

(1) and (3) amended and (5) added, (SB 20-030), ch. 148, p. 637, § 1, effective June 29.

40-3-103.6. Disconnection due to nonpayment - connection and reconnection fees - deposits - standard practices - rules - definitions.

The commission shall commence a rule-making proceeding to adopt standard practices for gas and electric utilities to use when disconnecting service due to nonpayment. The rules must address the following subjects:

Resources to support customers in multiple languages, as appropriate to the geographic areas served;

Prohibiting shut-off times:

On Fridays, Saturdays, Sundays, or state or federal holidays; or

To the greatest extent practicable, after 11:59 a.m. on a Monday through Thursday that is not a holiday; or

During an emergency or safety event or circumstance; and

If, by making a payment or payment arrangement in accordance with the utility's policies, a customer makes a request for reconnection of service on a Monday through Friday that is not a holiday, requiring the utility to reconnect the customer's service on the same day as the customer requests reconnection of service if one of the circumstances set forth in subsection (1.5) of this section is met.

Prescribed terms and conditions for payment plans to cure delinquency;

Referral of delinquent customers to energy payment assistance resources such as Energy Outreach Colorado, charities, nonprofits, and state agencies that provide, or that administer federal funds for, low-income energy assistance;

For each utility, standardized methodology to be used in determining reconnection fees and deposit requirements for reconnection;

Protection policies for customers for whom electricity is medically necessary;

Prohibitions on the disconnection of service during periods of extreme heat or cold, as appropriate to the geographic area served;

A prohibition on the remote disconnection of service for nonpayment, through advanced metering infrastructure or otherwise, without a reasonable attempt to make contact with the customer of record by telephone or engaging in a personal, physical visit to the premises; and

Reporting requirements, no less frequently than annually, to provide the commission with standardized information from all utilities about disconnections and delinquencies. For the purpose of trend analysis, utilities may disaggregate data by month or by quarter, as the commission deems appropriate. Reporting requirements must take into consideration existing utility reporting and must allow the utilities a reasonable ability to ascertain data.

(1.5) A utility shall reconnect a customer's service on the same day as the customer requests reconnection pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section if:

The customer is an electric utility customer with advanced metering infrastructure and has requested reconnection of service at least one hour before the close of business for the electric utility's customer service division; except that the electric utility may reconnect service on the day following a disconnection of service if there are internet connectivity, technical, or mechanical problems or emergency conditions that reasonably prevent the utility from remotely reconnecting the customer's service; or

The customer is either an electric utility customer without advanced metering infrastructure or a gas utility customer and has requested reconnection of service on or before 12:59 p.m.; except that an electric utility or gas utility may reconnect the customer's service on the day following a disconnection if:

Prior to disconnection of the customer's service, the utility has made a qualifying communication with the customer; or

An emergency or safety event or circumstance arises after disconnection of service that renders the utility's staff temporarily unavailable to safely reconnect service. If next-day reconnection of service is not possible due to the continuation of the emergency or safety event or circumstance, the utility shall reconnect the customer's service as soon as possible.

The commission shall publish on its website, or require utilities to publish on their websites:

Information regarding the standard practices and fees specified in rules adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and

The information periodically reported in accordance with subsection (1)(i) of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advanced metering infrastructure" means an integrated system of smart electric utility meters and communication networks that enables two-way communication between an electric utility's data systems and the meter's internet protocol address and allows the electric utility to measure electricity usage or connect or disconnect service remotely.

"Emergency or safety event or circumstance" means a manmade or natural emergency event or safety circumstance:

That prevents utility staff from being able to safely travel to or work at a customer's residence or place of business for purposes of reconnecting utility service; or

For which a utility has dispatched utility staff members to help respond to the emergency or safety event or circumstance and, due to the timing or number of utility staff dispatched, the utility lacks sufficient trained staff to reconnect utility service at a customer's residence or place of business.

"Emergency or safety event or circumstance" includes a severe weather event that one or more reputable weather forecasting sources forecasts to occur in the following twenty-four hours and that is more likely than not to result in dangerous travel or on-site outdoor or indoor work conditions for individuals in the path of the weather event.

"Qualifying communication" means one of the following methods of communicating with a utility customer about a possible upcoming disconnection of service:

A physical visit to the customer's premises during which a utility representative speaks with the customer and provides the customer utility assistance information or, if the customer is not available to speak, leaves utility assistance information for the customer's review; or

A telephone call, text, or e-mail to the customer in which:

The utility representative provides the customer with utility assistance information; and

The utility representative either speaks directly with the customer over the telephone or the customer receives the utility representative's text or e-mail.

"Utility assistance information" means information that a utility representative provides a customer informing the customer that the customer may contact 1-866-HEAT-HELP to determine if the customer qualifies for utility bill payment assistance.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-030), ch. 148, p. 638, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

IP(1) and (1)(b) amended and (1.5) and (3) added, (HB 22-1018), ch. 109, p. 497, § 2, effective April 21.

40-3-104. Changes in rates - notice.

In the case of a public utility other than a rail carrier, subject to the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection (1), no change shall be made by any public utility in any rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, or classification or in any rule, regulation, or contract relating to or affecting any rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, or service or in any privilege or facility, except after thirty days' notice to the commission and the public. Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph (a), changes in intrastate telecommunications services which have been determined by the commission to be competitive in nature, pursuant to the provisions of article 15 of this title, shall not be subject to any notice requirement, including, but not limited to, any requirement in this section whether or not denoted as a notice requirement.

Repealed.

A public utility shall provide the notice required under subsection (1)(a) of this section by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection new schedules stating plainly the changes to be made in the schedules then in force and the time when the changes will go into effect. At the time of the public utility's filing with the commission, the public utility shall post the notice on its public website, including a reference to the docket numbers of relevant rules or adjudicatory matters, which posting must be conspicuously displayed on the website for at least thirty days. The commission may require transportation and water utilities to give additional notice in a manner set forth by order or rule. For public utilities other than transportation and water utilities, the commission shall require additional notice prior to an increase or other change in any rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, or service, which additional notice may be made, at the option of the public utility, by any of the following methods:

Publication of a notice in each newspaper of general circulation in each county in which the public utility provides service, which notice shall be four columns wide and eleven inches high stating plainly the changes and shall be published once each week for two successive weeks during the first twenty days of the thirty-day period prior to the effective date of the increase or change. If notice is given by publication, public utilities other than those providing intrastate telecommunications services pursuant to section 40-15-104 (1) shall also be required to include, with each regular billing statement mailed to affected customers during the first regular billing cycle following the filing of the application for an increase or other change, a bill insert containing the same information contained in the notice by newspaper publication.

Mailing of a notice to each affected customer of the public utility during the first twenty days of the thirty-day period prior to the effective date of the increase or change;

Inclusion of an insert in, or a clear and conspicuous statement on, the bill mailed to each affected customer of the public utility during a regular billing cycle not later than the twentieth day of the thirty-day period prior to the effective date of the increase or change;

Subject to subsection (1)(c)(VII) of this section, not later than the twentieth day of the thirty-day period before the effective date of the increase or change, sending an e-mail or text message to each affected customer of the public utility for whom the utility has an e-mail address or a mobile telephone number; or

At the request of the public utility, such other manner as the commission may prescribe.

Such additional notice shall be sufficient if it states the total dollar amount sought to be raised by such increased rates or other changes and, if determinable at the time of filing, the average monthly increase, by dollar amount or percentage, to customers served under residential and small business tariffs; states the effective date or dates thereof; contains a general description of the types of services to be affected thereby; informs affected customers, other than residential and small business customers, where they may call to obtain information during the thirty-day period prior to the effective date of the proposed increases or changes concerning how such increases or changes will affect them; and includes the telephone number and address of the commission with instructions regarding the registration of a protest to the proposed increases or changes. Proof of additional notice shall be filed by the public utility with the commission.

Increases in rates, fares, tolls, rentals, or charges associated with electric and gas utility adjustment clauses are subject only to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

For public utilities other than transportation and water utilities, where increases or changes in any rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, or service result from requested increases in revenue requirements and rate restructuring and are contained in a single advice letter or application, the additional notice required under subparagraphs (I) and (II) of this paragraph (c) shall be deemed sufficient if a single notice is given even if more than one proceeding is established by the commission with respect to the increases or changes.

In the case of a public utility that provides regulated intrastate telecommunications services:

Notice of a decrease in a rate or charge for any regulated telecommunications service shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection for a period of fourteen days the new schedule stating plainly the decrease to be made and the time that the decrease will become effective. Such decreases shall not be subject to any additional notice requirements.

Notice of changes in terms and conditions for any regulated telecommunications service shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection for a period of fourteen days the new schedule stating plainly the changes to be made in the terms and conditions and the time that the changes will become effective. Such changes in the terms and conditions shall not be subject to any additional notice requirements unless the commission determines that such additional notice is in the public interest. Any such additional notice shall be given in a manner specified by the commission.

A public utility that provides additional notice pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section must include in the additional notice:

The public utility's public website address; and

A toll-free telephone number associated with the public utility that a customer may call for additional information or assistance. If a public utility sends additional notice by e-mail or text message pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(I)(D) of this section, the e-mail or text message need not include all information required by this subsection (1)(c)(VI); however, the e-mail or text message must include a link to the portion of the public utility's public website where that information is posted.

A public utility may provide additional notice pursuant to subsection (1)(c)(I)(D) of this section only if the public utility provides its customers with a mechanism by which a customer may opt out of receiving e-mail or text message notifications. For any customer that opts out, the public utility shall provide an alternate method of additional notice authorized under subsection (1)(c)(I) of this section.

The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes with less notice than is required by subsection (1) of this section by an order specifying the changes so to be made and the time when they shall take effect and the manner in which they shall be filed and published.

When any change is proposed in any rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, or classification or in any form of contract or agreement or in any rule, regulation, or contract relating to or affecting any rate, fare, toll, rental, charge, classification, or service or in any privilege or facility, attention shall be directed to such change on the schedule filed with the commission immediately preceding or following the item.

and (5) Repealed.

Source:

L. 13:

p. 470, § 16.

C.L.

§ 2927.

CSA:

C. 137, § 17.

CRS 53:

§ 115-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 115-3-4.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 1036, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 1296, § 1, effective May 19.

L. 2000:

(1)(b), (4), and (5) repealed, p. 215, § 1, effective March 29.

L. 2002:

(1)(c)(V) added, p. 200, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

IP(1)(c)(I) and (1)(c)(I)(D) amended, (SB 15-261), ch. 291, p. 1188, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

IP(1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(I)(C), and (1)(c)(I)(D) amended and (1)(c)(I)(E), (1)(c)(VI), and (1)(c)(VII) added, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3304, § 10, effective May 30.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act enacting subsection (1)(c)(V), see section 1 of chapter 74, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.